Washington statutes.
RCW 25.15.396

Complaint.

In a derivative action, the complaint must set forth with particularity:

(1) The date and content of plaintiff's demand and the members' or managers' response to the demand; or

(2) Why a demand should be excused as futile.

[ 2015 c 188 s 77.]